FST/rus/morph_rus.lexc
Multichar_Symbols %+N
        %+NOM%+SG %+NOM%+PL
        %+GEN%+SG %+GEN%+PL
        %+DAT%+SG %+DAT%+PL
        %+INS%+SG %+INS%+PL
        %+ESS%+SG %+ESS%+PL
        %+ACC%+ANIM%+SG %+ACC%+ANIM%+PL
        %+ACC%+INAN%+SG %+ACC%+INAN%+PL

LEXICON Root
noun_roots;

LEXICON noun_roots
кошка   noun;
собака  noun;
крот    noun;
кот     noun;
собеседница     noun;

LEXICON noun
%+N     n_inf;

LEXICON n_inf
%+NOM%+SG       #;
%+NOM%+PL       #;
%+GEN%+SG       #;
%+GEN%+PL       #;
%+DAT%+SG       #;
%+DAT%+PL       #;
%+INS%+SG       #;
%+INS%+PL       #;
%+ESS%+SG       #;
%+ESS%+PL       #;
%+ACC%+ANIM%+SG #;
%+ACC%+ANIM%+PL #;
%+ACC%+INAN%+SG #;
%+ACC%+INAN%+PL #;
